Hawaii statutes.
§711-1109.2 Forfeiture of animal prior to
disposition of criminal charges. (1) If any pet animal or equine animal
is impounded pursuant to section 711-1109.1, prior to final disposition of a
criminal charge under section 711-1108.5, 711-1109, 711-1109.3, or 711-1109.35,
as applicable, against the pet animal's or equine animal's owner, any duly
incorporated humane society or duly incorporated society for the prevention of
cruelty to animals that is holding the pet animal or equine animal may file a
petition in the criminal action requesting that the court issue an order for
forfeiture of the pet animal or equine animal to the county or to the duly
incorporated humane society or duly incorporated society for the prevention of
cruelty to animals prior to final disposition of the criminal charge. The
petitioner shall serve a true copy of the petition upon the defendant and the
prosecuting attorney.

(2) Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to
subsection (1), the court shall set a hearing on the petition. The hearing
shall be conducted within fourteen days after the filing of the petition, or as
soon as practicable.

(3) At a hearing conducted pursuant to
subsection (2), the petitioner shall have the burden of establishing probable
cause that the pet animal or equine animal was subjected to a violation of
section 711-1108.5, 711-1109, 711-1109.3, or 711-1109.35, as applicable. If
the court finds that probable cause exists, the court shall order immediate
forfeiture of the pet animal or equine animal to the petitioner, unless the
defendant, within seventy-two hours of the hearing:

(a) Posts a security deposit or bond with the court
clerk in an amount determined by the court to be sufficient to repay all
reasonable costs incurred, and anticipated to be incurred, by the petitioner in
caring for the pet animal or equine animal from the date of initial impoundment
to the date of trial; or

(b) Demonstrates to the court that proper
alternative care has been arranged for the pet animal or equine animal.

Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a), a court may
waive, for good cause shown, the requirement that the defendant post a security
deposit or bond.

(4) If a security deposit or bond has been
posted in accordance with subsection (3)(a), the petitioner may draw from the security
deposit or bond the actual reasonable costs incurred by the petitioner in
caring for the pet animal or equine animal until the date of final disposition
of the criminal action. If the trial is continued to a later date, any order
of continuance shall require the defendant to post an additional security
deposit or bond in an amount determined by the court that shall be sufficient
to repay all additional reasonable costs anticipated to be incurred by the
petitioner in caring for the pet animal or equine animal until the date of
final disposition of the criminal action, and the petitioner may draw from the
additional security deposit or bond as necessary.

(5) No pet animal or equine animal may be
destroyed by a petitioner under this section prior to final disposition of a
criminal charge under section 711-1108.5, 711-1109, 711-1109.3, or 711-1109.35,
as applicable, against the pet animal's or equine animal's owner, except in the
event that the pet animal or equine animal is so severely injured that there is
no reasonable probability that its life can be saved.

(6) Forfeiture of a pet animal or equine
animal under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter
712A.

(7) In addition to any reasonable costs
incurred under subsection (4) by the petitioner in the caring for the pet
animal or equine animal, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees and
court costs to the petitioner following the conviction of the defendant.

(8) As used in this section, "pet animal
or equine animal" includes any offspring from the pet animal or equine
animal that was pregnant at the time of the rescue and born during the
impoundment of the pet animal or equine animal. [L 2006, c 239, pt of §1; am L
2007, c 114, §6; am L 2008, c 128, §§3, 7; am L 2009, c 11, §15 as superseded
by c 160, §3; am L 2011, c 149, §§3, 6; am L 2012, c 25, §2]

Note

The repeal and reenactment notes at subsections (1), (3), and
(5) in the main volume took effect on July 1, 2015, pursuant to L 2008, c 128,
§7; L 2009, c 160, §3; and L 2011, c 149, §6.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next